Hawaii statutes.
§180-12 Appointment, election,
qualifications, and tenure of directors. The terms of office of the two
district directors appointed pursuant to section 180-7 shall be three years,
except that those first appointed shall be for one and two years, respectively.
The terms of the three elected directors shall be three years. Unexpired terms
shall be filled by a majority vote of the district's remaining directors.
Successors to full terms shall be appointed or elected, as originally
selected. The directors shall either live or work in the districts they
represent. The districts shall conduct their own elections and submit the
results to the department for certification. Land occupiers representing
individual farms, ranches, or plantations are eligible to have one vote for
each one hundred acres or less lying within a district. Each acreage can be
accounted for only once, with priority voting in order of land occupier, and
land owner, respectively; provided that to be eligible to vote, a land occupier
shall first provide the district with its name, address, and information
clearly identifying the acreage. The directors shall designate a chairperson
and may, from time to time, change the designation. A majority of the
directors shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of a majority upon any
official matter shall be necessary. Directors shall receive no compensation
for their services, but shall be entitled to necessary expenses. They may
employ and fix the compensation of such officers and employees as they may
require, and shall provide for surety bonds for employees or officers who are
entrusted with funds. Directors shall keep a record of proceedings,
resolutions, rules, and orders issued or adopted, and accounts of receipts and
disbursements, and shall furnish to the department copies of such documents,
instruments, or information concerning their activities as the department may
request. [L 1947, c 191, §6; RL 1955, §28-15; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L
1961, c 132, §2; am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-12; am L 1991, c 94, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next